nb: Linets vevtype: Kurvvev; Lerret- / seilduksvev; Damask; Dobby; Gas; Fiskebeinsmønster; Jacquard; Toskaftsbinding; Slub-vev; Kypert; Annet
tr: Keten dokuma türü: Sepet örgü; Kanvas/kaba pamuklu örgü; Damasko; Armürlü; Gaz bezi; Balıksırtı; Jakar; Düz örgü; Şantuklu örgü; Dimi; Diğer
pl: Rodzaj splotu lnianego: Splot panamowy; Splot płócienny / duck; Damaszek; Splot rzemykowy (dobby); Gaza; Jodełka; Żakard; Splot płócienny; Splot z przędzy typu slub; Diagonal; Inne
fi: Pellavakudostyyppi: Panamasidos; Kanvaasi / palttinasidos; Damasti; Dobby-sidos; Harsokangas; Kalanruoto; Jacquard; Palttinasidos; Nuppulankasidos; Toimikas; Muu
zh-TW: 亞麻織法類型: 籃網織法; 帆布/帆布平織; 錦緞; 多臂織法; 紗布; 人字紋; 提花; 平織; 竹節織法; 斜紋織法; 其他
da: Linnedvævningstype: Panamavævning; Lærredsvævning; Damask; Dobby; Gaze; Sildeben; Jacquard; Lærredsbinding; Slub-vævning; Twill; Andet
it: Tipo di armatura del lino: Armatura a panama; Armatura a tela; Damasco; Dobby; Garza; Spina di pesce; Jacquard; Armatura a tela semplice; Armatura fiammata; Twill; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de tecido de linho: Trama de cesto; Lona; Damasco; Dobby; Gaze; Espinha; Jacquard; Trama simples; Trama flamê; Sarja; Outro
el: Τύπος ύφανσης από λινό: Ψάθα; Καμβάς/duck weave; Νταμάσκ; Ντόμπι; Γάζα; Ψαροκόκαλο; Ζακάρ; Απλή ύφανση; Ύφανση slub; Τουίλ; Άλλο
pt-BR: Linho tipo de trama: Trama de cesto; Lona/trama duck; Damasco; Maquinetado; Gaze; Espinha de peixe; Jacquard; Trama simples; Trama flamê; Sarja; Outro
en: Linen weave type: Basketweave; Canvas/duck weave; Damask; Dobby; Gauze; Herringbone; Jacquard; Plain weave; Slub weave; Twill; Other
ro-RO: Tip de țesătură de in: Împletitură tip coș; Pânză/țesătură duck; Damasc; Dobby; Tifon; Os de pește; Jacquard; Țesătură simplă; Țesătură slub; Twill; Altele
ru: Тип переплетения льна: Рогожка; Канвас/парусина; Дамаск; Добби; Газ; В елочку; Жаккард; Полотняное переплетение; Переплетение из фасонной пряжи (slub); Саржевое переплетение; Другое
zh-CN: 亚麻织物编织类型: 席纹编织; 帆布/粗帆布编织; 锦缎编织; 多臂提花编织; 纱布编织; 人字纹编织; 提花编织; 平纹编织; 竹节纹编织; 斜纹编织; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta lanenog tkanja: Panama vez; Platneni / duck vez; Damast; Dobby vez; Gaza; Uzorak riblje kosti; Žakard; Platneni vez; Slub tkanje; Keper; Ostalo
th: ประเภทการทอผ้าลินิน: ทอลายตะกร้า; ผ้าใบ/ลายขัดหนา; ดามัสก์; ด็อบบี้; ผ้าสาลู/ผ้าก๊อซ; ลายก้างปลา; แจ็กการ์ด; ลายขัด; ทอลายสลัฟ; ลายทแยง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta tkanja lana: Košarasta vezava; Platnena vezava (Canvas/Duck); Damast; Dobby; Gaza; Ribja kost; Žakard; Platnena vezava; Slub vezava; Keper; Drugo
de: Webart des Leinens: Panamabindung; Canvas-/Segeltuchbindung; Damast; Dobby; Gaze; Fischgrät; Jacquard; Leinwandbindung; Flammengarnbindung; Köper; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ ľanovej väzby: Panamová väzba; Plátnová/kanvas väzba; Damašek; Listová väzba (Dobby); Gáza; Rybia kosť; Žakár; Plátnová väzba; Väzba z plameňovej priadze; Keper; Iné
lt-LT: Lino pynimo tipas: Krepšelinio pynimo; Drobės pynimas; Damastas; Dobi pynimas; Marlės pynimas; Eglutės pynimas; Žakardas; Paprastas pynimas; Slub pynimas; Ruoželinis pynimas; Kita
vi: Loại vải lanh dệt: Dệt vân giỏ; Dệt canvas/vải bố; Dệt gấm Damask; Dệt Dobby; Dệt gạc; Dệt vân xương cá; Dệt Jacquard; Dệt trơn; Dệt sợi slub; Dệt chéo; Khác
bg-BG: Тип тъкане на лен: Панамена плетка; Канвас/патешка плетка; Дамаска; Доби; Тензух; Рибена кост; Жакард; Гладка тъкан; Тъкан с удебелени нишки; Кепър; Друго
es: Tipo de tejido del lino: Esterilla; Tejido de lona/loneta; Damasco; Tejido dobby; Gasa; Diseño de espiga; Jacquard; Tejido tafetán; Tejido flameado; Sarga; Otro
sv: Typ av linneväv: Panamabindning; Kanvas/tuskaft; Damast; Dobby; Glesväv; Fiskbensmönstrad; Jacquard; Tuskaft; Slubväv; Kypert; Övrigt
hu: Lenvászon szövéstípusa: Kosárkötés; Kanavász/vászonkötés; Damaszt; Dobby-kötés; Gézkötés; Halszálkás; Jacquard; Sima vászonkötés; Szabálytalan szövésű; Sávolykötés; Egyéb
fr: Type d’armure du lin: Natté; Toile/bâchette; Damas; Dobby; Gaze; Chevrons; Jacquard; Armure toile; Tissu flammé; Sergé; Autre
cs: Typ lněné vazby: Panamová vazba; Kanvas / plátnová vazba; Damašek; Listová vazba; Gázovina; Rybí kost; Žakár; Plátnová vazba; Strukturovaná vazba (slub); Kepr; Jiné
nl: Linnen weeftype: Panamabinding; Canvas-/duck-binding; Damast; Dobby; Gaasbinding; Visgraat; Jacquard; Platbinding; Slub-binding; Keperbinding; Overige
ja: リネン織りタイプ: バスケット織り; キャンバス/ダック織り; ダマスク織り; ドビー織り; ガーゼ; ヘリンボーン; ジャカード織り; 平織り; スラブ織り; 綾織り (ツイル); その他
ko: 린넨 직조 유형: 바스켓 위브; 캔버스/덕 위브; 다마스크; 도비; 거즈; 헤링본; 자카드; 평직; 슬러브 위브; 트윌; 기타